Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-8,121
Interstate bridges; free of toll.

All interstate bridges, or portions thereof, constructed, purchased, acquired, or maintained by the department shall be free of tolls.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 31, p. 646.